Alaska statutes. Title 10. Corporations and Associations.
Article 2. Name; Registered Office and Agent; Service of Process.

Sec. 10.50.020.
Limited liability company name.

The name of a limited liability company stated in the company’s articles of organization must contain the words “limited liability company” or the abbreviation “L.L.C.,” or “LLC”. The word “limited” may be abbreviated as “Ltd.,” and the word “company” may be abbreviated as “Co.”

The name of a city, borough, or village may be used in a limited liability company name; however, the name may not contain the word “city,” “borough,” or “village” or otherwise imply that the company is a municipality.

A person may not adopt a name that contains the words “limited liability company” unless the person is organized under this chapter or is registered as a foreign limited liability company under this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1994)

Sec. 10.50.025.
Distinguishable name.

The name of a limited liability company must be distinguishable on the records of the department from the name of any other organized entity and from a reserved or registered name. The department may adopt regulations to implement this section. In this section, “organized entity” and “reserved or registered name” have the meanings given in AS

10.35.040

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1994; am § 23 ch 50 SLA 1999)

Cross references. —

For applicability of amendment to this section made by § 23, ch. 50, SLA 1999, see § 36(a) and (b), ch. 50, SLA 1999 in the 1999 Temporary & Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For corporations, partnerships, and other business organizations, see 3 AAC 16.

Sec. 10.50.030.
Right to reserve name.

The exclusive right to use a name may be reserved by a

person intending to organize a limited liability company and to adopt the name;

person intending to organize a foreign limited liability company and to register under this chapter;

limited liability company, or a foreign limited liability company registered under this chapter, that intends to change its name; or

foreign limited liability company that intends to register under this chapter and to adopt the name.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1994)

Sec. 10.50.035.
Application to reserve company name.

Reservation of a name under AS

10.50.030

is made by filing an application with the department. If the department finds that the name is available for use by a limited liability company and is distinguishable on the records of the department under AS

10.50.025

, the department shall reserve it for the exclusive use of the applicant for a period of 120 days.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1994; am § 24 ch 50 SLA 1999)

Cross references. —

For applicability of amendment to this section made by § 24, ch. 50, SLA 1999, see § 36(a) and (b), ch. 50, SLA 1999 in the 1999 Temporary & Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For corporations, partnerships, and other business organizations, see 3 AAC 16.

Sec. 10.50.038.
Transfer of reserved name.

The holder of a name reserved under AS

10.50.030

may transfer the right to the exclusive use of the name to another person by filing a notice of transfer with the department, signed by the holder of the name, and specifying the name and address of the transferee.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1994)

Sec. 10.50.040.
Registration of company name.

A limited liability company or a foreign limited liability company may register its name if the name is distinguishable on the records of the department under AS

10.50.025

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1994; am § 25 ch 50 SLA 1999)

Cross references. —

For applicability of amendment to this section made by § 25, ch. 50, SLA 1999, see § 36(a) and (b), ch. 50, SLA 1999 in the 1999 Temporary & Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For corporations, partnerships, and other business organizations, see 3 AAC 16.

Sec. 10.50.043.
Exclusive right to use of name; use of nondistinguishable name.

Organization or registration under this chapter, or registration of a name under this chapter, gives the person who has organized or registered under this chapter, or registered a name under this chapter, exclusive right to the use of the name. The person may enjoin the use of a name that is not distinguishable from the name to which the person has the exclusive right and the person has a cause of action for damages against a person who uses a name that is not distinguishable from the name to which the person has the exclusive right.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1994)

Sec. 10.50.048.
Procedure for registration of company name.

Registration of a name under AS

10.50.040

is made by filing with the department

a signed application for registration setting out the name of the company, the state or territory under the laws of which it is organized, the date of organization, a statement that it is conducting affairs, and a brief statement of its principal activities; and

proof from the jurisdiction where the company is organized that indicates that the company is organized in that jurisdiction if the company is a foreign limited liability company.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1994)

Sec. 10.50.050.
Duration of name registration.

The registration of a name under AS

10.50.040

is effective until the close of the calendar year in which the application for registration is filed.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1994)

Sec. 10.50.053.
Renewal of name registration.

The registration of a name under AS

10.50.040

may be renewed each year by

filing an application for renewal setting out the facts required in an original application for registration;

filing proof of organization required for an original registration; and

paying a fee established by the department.

An application for renewal shall be filed between October 1 and December 31 in each year. The renewal extends the registration for the following calendar year.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1994)

Sec. 10.50.055.
Registered office and registered agent.

A limited liability company shall continuously maintain in this state a registered agent and a registered office. The registered office may be the same as the office of the company. The registered agent may be either an individual resident of this state whose business office is the same as the registered office, or a domestic or foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this state whose business office is the same as the registered office.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1994)

Sec. 10.50.060.
Change of registered office or agent by company.

A limited liability company may change its registered office, agent, or both, by filing with the department a signed statement that includes

the name of the company;

the address of its registered office;

the address of its new registered office if the registered office is to be changed;

the name of its registered agent;

the name of its new registered agent if the registered agent is to be changed; and

a statement that the change is authorized by the company’s manager, or, if the company is not managed by a manager, by the members.

If the department finds that the statement complies with this chapter, the department shall file it in the department’s office. The change becomes effective when the statement is filed.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1994; am § 40 ch 65 SLA 1998)

Sec. 10.50.063.
Registered agent’s change of office location or resignation.

A registered agent of a limited liability company may change the location of the agent’s office from one address to another in this state. The agent may change the registered office for each company for which the person is acting as registered agent by filing in the department a statement setting out the name of the agent, the address of the agent’s office before change, the address to which the office is changed, and a list of companies for which the person is the registered agent. The statement shall be executed by the registered agent in the individual name of the agent or, if the agent is a corporation, it shall be executed by its president or a vice-president. The statement shall be delivered to the department and the limited liability company and, if the department finds that the statement complies with this chapter, the department shall file it. The change becomes effective when the statement is filed.

A registered agent may resign by filing a written notice and an exact copy of the notice with the department. The written notice of resignation must set out the latest address of the principal office of the company and the name, address, and title of the manager, or, if the company is managed by its members, the names and addresses of the members of the company known by the agent. The department shall immediately mail a copy of the notice to the company at its principal office. The resignation becomes effective 30 days after the filing of the written notice, unless the company sooner appoints a successor registered agent, as provided in AS

10.50.060

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1994; am § 41 ch 65 SLA 1998)

Sec. 10.50.065.
Service on company.

The registered agent of a limited liability company is an agent upon whom process, notice, or demand required or permitted by law to be served upon the company may be served.

If a limited liability company fails to appoint or maintain a registered agent in this state, or if its registered agent cannot, with reasonable diligence, be found at the registered office, the commissioner is an agent of the company upon whom the process, notice, or demand may be served. A person may serve the commissioner under this subsection by

serving on the commissioner or the designee of the commissioner a copy of the process, notice, or demand, with any papers required by law to be delivered in connection with the service, and a fee established by the department by regulation;

sending to the company being served by certified mail a notice that service has been made on the commissioner under this subsection and a copy of the process, notice, or demand and accompanying papers; notice to the company shall be sent to

the address of the last registered office of the company as shown by the records on file in the department; and

the address, the use of which the person initiating the proceedings knows or, on the basis of reasonable inquiry, has reason to believe is most likely to result in actual notice; and

filing with the appropriate court or other body, as part of the return of service, the return receipt of mailing and an affidavit of the person initiating the proceedings that this section has been complied with.

The commissioner shall keep a record of processes, notices, and demands served upon the commissioner under this section.

This section does not affect the right to serve process, notice, or demand required or permitted by law to be served upon a company in any other manner permitted.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1994)